Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-311
Rules and regulations; vendors; violation; penalty.

The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations permitting the sale, trade, or vending of any goods, products, or commodities of any type in any area under its ownership or control. Any person who sells, trades, or vends any goods, products, or commodities of any type in any area under the ownership or control of the commission without having received the prior permission of the commission for such activity shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 69.